New Jersey, session 222, S4520.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. There is established a three-year Jersey Protein Pro pilot program in the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. The purpose of the pilot program shall be to create a Statewide workforce pipeline for employment in the meat processing industry and to address persistent workforce shortages that delay facility operations and force farmers to ship livestock out of State. b.  The Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development, in consultation with the Commissioner of Agriculture, the Secretary of Higher Education, county colleges, and county vocational school districts, shall design the pilot program to establish a workforce credential program that provides short-course training at participating institutions in meat cutting, food safety and hazard analysis critical control point (HACCP), sanitation, and plant maintenance. c.  The pilot program shall be administered by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, in consultation with the Department of Agriculture, and shall operate through the award of grants to qualified participating institutions. Participating institutions may include county colleges, county vocational school districts, and other entities acting in cooperation with the department as determined by the commissioner.  The Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development shall develop an application process by which an institution may demonstrate it is qualified to provide the training necessary to effectuate the purposes of the pilot program. d.  Participating institutions shall use grant funds to develop and offer training courses necessary to effectuate the purposes of the pilot program, including, but not limited to curriculum development, the purchase of instructional equipment, and the provision of hands-on training. Grant funds also may be used by participating institutions to provide tuition assistance to eligible participants who agree to remain employed in this State for not less than two years after completion of the program. 2. Not later than six months following the effective date of this act and biannually thereafter until the pilot program is ended, each participating institution shall submit a report to the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development detailing the institutions use of grant funds for the preceding period, to include the number of participants trained, the amount of tuition assistance provided, and any other information deemed necessary by the commissioner. 3. Not later than one year following the effective date of this act and annually thereafter, the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development shall submit to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature, a report reviewing the implementation and operation of the pilot program. The final report additionally shall make recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature concerning whether to amend, extend, or make permanent the program. 4. There is appropriated to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development from the General Fund $3 million to effectuate the purposes of this act. 5. This act shall take effect immediately.